Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-450
Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine; immediate precursor; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

No person shall sell, distribute, or otherwise transfer any drug product containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, if the person knows that the transferee will use the drug product as an immediate precursor to any controlled substance. No person shall unlawfully sell, distribute, or otherwise transfer such a product with reckless disregard as to how the drug product will be used. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2001, LB 113, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 117, § 4.